src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
 galopP1i 28; ! (28_V -> ) at: galoppi, an: galopi
 hüü 34_D_TUD; ! (34_V -> ) at: hüüd, (bt): hüüda, bn: hüüa, cn: hüü
 kaagatel 36; ! (36_V -> ) an: kaagatele, bn: kaagatel, bt: kaagatel, cn: kaagatell, ct: kaagatell
 kaaK1 30; ! (30_V -> ) at: kaakle, (bt): kaakel, bn: kaagel
 kaits 32_E; ! (32_V -> ) at: kaits, (bt): kaitse, bn: kaitse
 kan 34_D_TUD; ! (34_V -> ) at: kand, (bt): kanda, bn: kanna, cn: kan
 kaT1 35_T; ! (35_V -> ) at: kat, (bt): katta, bn: kata, ct: katt, cn: kae
 kee 37; ! (37_V -> ) at: kee, an: kee
 kest 34; ! (34_V -> ) at: kest, (bt): kesta, bn: kesta, cn: keste
 kihel 31; ! (31_V -> ) a0: kihele, b0: kihel
 kiisuta 27; ! (27_V -> ) a0: kiisuta
 kiusa 29; ! (29_V -> ) at: kiusa, an: kiusa
 kombaini 28; ! (28_V -> ) at: kombaini, an: kombaini
 kool 33_E; ! (33_V -> ) at: kool, (bt): koole, bn: koole
 kus 36_ema; ! (36_V -> ) an: kuse, bn: #, bt: #, cn: #, ct: #
 kuul 33_E; ! (33_V -> ) at: kuul, (bt): kuule, bn: kuule
 kät 30; ! (30_V -> ) at: kätle, (bt): kättel, bn: kätel
 lakatel 36; ! (36_V -> ) an: lakatele, bn: lakatel, bt: lakatel, cn: lakatell, ct: lakatell
 las 34_K_TUD; ! (34_V -> ) at: lask, (bt): laske, bn: lase, cn: las
 laul 33; ! (33_V -> ) at: laul, (bt): laula, bn: laula
 lee 37; ! (37_V -> ) at: lee, an: lee
 liiT1 34; ! (34_V -> ) at: liit, (bt): liita, bn: liida, cn: liide
 lo. 38; ! (38_V -> ) at: loo, an: loo, bt: luu, bn: luu, ct: lõ, cn: lõ
 logel 31; ! (31_V -> ) a0: logele, b0: logel
 lõp 35_P; ! (35_V -> ) at: lõp, (bt): lõppe, bn: lõpe, ct: lõpp, cn: lõpe
 läkasta 27; ! (27_V -> ) a0: läkasta
 lö. 38; ! (38_V -> ) at: löö, an: löö, bt: lüü, bn: lüü, ct: lõ, cn: lõ
 lüps 32; ! (32_V -> ) at: lüps, (bt): lüpsa, bn: lüpsa
 maits 32_E; ! (32_V -> ) at: maits, (bt): maitse, bn: maitse
 maks 32; ! (32_V -> ) at: maks, (bt): maksa, bn: maksa
 maT1 35_T; ! (35_V -> ) at: mat, (bt): matta, bn: mata, ct: matt, cn: mae
 mesta 29; ! (29_V -> ) at: mesta, an: mesta
 mõs 34_K_TUD; ! (34_V -> ) at: mõsk, (bt): mõske, bn: mõse, cn: mõs
 möön 33; ! (33_V -> ) at: möön, (bt): mööna, bn: mööna
 müü 38_SIN; ! (38_V -> ) at: müü, an: müü, bt: müü, bn: müü, ct: #, cn: #
 nai 37; ! (37_V -> ) at: nai, an: nai
 nee 34_D_TUD; ! (34_V -> ) at: need, (bt): needa, bn: nea, cn: nee
 neel 33; ! (33_V -> ) at: neel, (bt): neela, bn: neela
 nä 28_gema; ! (28_V -> ) at: näge, an: näe
 peks 32; ! (32_V -> ) at: peks, (bt): peksa, bn: peksa
 personifitseeri 28; ! (28_V -> ) at: personifitseeri, an: personifitseeri
 pes 36_ema; ! (36_V -> ) an: pese, bn: #, bt: #, cn: #, ct: #
 poo 38_SIN; ! (38_V -> ) at: poo, an: poo, bt: puu, bn: puu, ct: #, cn: #
 pus 34_K_TUD; ! (34_V -> ) at: pusk, (bt): puske, bn: puse, cn: pus
 pusel 31; ! (31_V -> ) a0: pusele, b0: pusel
 päita 27; ! (27_V -> ) a0: päita
 pätsa 29; ! (29_V -> ) at: pätsa, an: pätsa
 pääs 32_E; ! (32_V -> ) at: pääs, (bt): pääse, bn: pääse
 pääst 34; ! (34_V -> ) at: pääst, (bt): päästa, bn: päästa, cn: pääste
 rõõm 30; ! (30_V -> ) at: rõõmle, (bt): rõõmel, bn: rõõmel
 saa 37; ! (37_V -> ) at: saa, an: saa
 seis 32; ! (32_V -> ) at: seis, (bt): seisa, bn: seisa
 sõu 34_D_TUD; ! (34_V -> ) at: sõud, (bt): sõuda, bn: sõua, cn: sõu
 särel 31; ! (31_V -> ) a0: särele, b0: särel
 taotel 36; ! (36_V -> ) an: taotele, bn: taotel, bt: taotel, cn: taotell, ct: taotell
 tap 35_P; ! (35_V -> ) at: tap, (bt): tappa, bn: tapa, ct: tapp, cn: tape
 te 28_gema; ! (28_V -> ) at: tege, an: tee
 to. 38; ! (38_V -> ) at: too, an: too, bt: tuu, bn: tuu, ct: tõ, cn: tõ
 toksi 28; ! (28_V -> ) at: toksi, an: toksi
 tusastu 27; ! (27_V -> ) a0: tusastu
 tusK1a 29; ! (29_V -> ) at: tuska, an: tusa
 uhT1 34; ! (34_V -> ) at: uht, (bt): uhta, bn: uha, cn: uhe
 veen 33; ! (33_V -> ) at: veen, (bt): veena, bn: veena
 vii 38_SIN; ! (38_V -> ) at: vii, an: vii, bt: vii, bn: vii, ct: #, cn: #
 võiT1 30; ! (30_V -> ) at: võitle, (bt): võitel, bn: võidel
 võT1 35_T; ! (35_V -> ) at: võt, (bt): võtta, bn: võta, ct: võtt, cn: võe
 õits 32_E; ! (32_V -> ) at: õits, (bt): õitse, bn: õitse
